Colorado, session 2026A, HB1067.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-50-114, amend (3);
and add (2.5) as follows:
35-50-114. Indemnification of livestock owners - livestock health
preparedness, response, and diseased livestock indemnity fund.
(2.5) THE COMMISSIONER, UPON THE RECOMMENDATION OF THE
STATE VETERINARIAN, MAY AUTHORIZE THE DEPARTMENT TO EXPEND
MONEY IN THE LIVESTOCK HEALTH PREPAREDNESS, RESPONSE, AND
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

DISEASED LIVESTOCK INDEMNITY FUND TO PREPARE FOR AND RESPOND TO:
(a) INFECTIOUS OR CONTAGIOUS DISEASES THAT POSE A THREAT TO
LIVESTOCK; AND
(b) BIOLOGICAL OR CHEMICAL CONTAMINANTS OF ANIMALS THAT
POSE A THREAT TO LIVESTOCK.
(3) (a) There is created in the state treasury the LIVESTOCK HEALTH
PREPAREDNESS, RESPONSE, AND diseased livestock indemnity fund. The
unexpended and unencumbered balance of money appropriated by the
general assembly for payments for the services of commissioned or
appointed personnel pursuant to section 35-50-104 shall be credited to the
LIVESTOCK HEALTH PREPAREDNESS, RESPONSE, AND diseased livestock
indemnity fund, upon approval of the commissioner, at the end of each
fiscal year. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the
purpose of making payments as provided in this section.
(b) (I) On June 30, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer two
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the diseased livestock indemnity fund
to the general fund.
(II) This subsection (3)(b) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-50-118, amend (5)
as follows:
35-50-118. Civil penalties.
(5) All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be
transmitted CREDITED to the LIVESTOCK HEALTH PREPAREDNESS, RESPONSE,
AND diseased livestock indemnity fund created in section 35-50-114 (3).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1067

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1067